Wyoming statutes. Title 11 Agriculture, Livestock and Other Animals
Chapter 34 State Loan and Investment Board

Cross references. —

For constitutional provisions relating to public debt, see art. 16, Wyo. Const.

As to authority of state in its political subdivisions to invest in federal farm and housing securities, see §

9-4-831

.

As to cooperative marketing associations, see §§

17-10-101

to

17-10-253

.

As to powers and duties of state loan and investment board with reference to bonds held by state in connection with irrigation and drainage districts generally, see §§

41-6-201

to

41-6-209

.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

3 Am. Jur. 2d Agriculture §§ 20 to 37; 55 Am. Jur. 2d Mortgages § 1 et seq.; 63C Am. Jur. 2d Public Funds § 1 et seq.

Applicability of state laws to federal crop loans, 1 ALR2d 712.

Validity and effect of side agreement respecting purchase price of property made in violation of statutes pertaining to, and regulations of federal farm loan agency, 30 ALR2d 1228.

3 C.J.S. Agriculture §§ 25 to 64; 81A C.J.S. States §§ 203 to 262.